District of Columbia statutes.
46-401

Equal access to marriage.

(a)

Marriage is the legally recognized union of 2 persons. Any person may enter into a marriage in the District of Columbia with another person, regardless of gender, unless the marriage is expressly prohibited by § 46-401.01 or § 46-403.

(b)

Where necessary to implement the rights and responsibilities relating to the marital relationship or familial relationships, gender-specific terms shall be construed to be gender neutral for all purposes throughout the law, whether in the context of statute, administrative or court rule, policy, common law, or any other source of civil law.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1391, ch. 854, § 1283
as added Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-110, § 2(b), 57 DCR 27

Section References

This section is referenced in § 32-702.